District of Columbia statutes.
38-271.04

Annual capacity audit.

The Mayor shall submit to the Council by September 30 of each year, beginning in 2008, a capacity audit of pre-k programs for all sectors, to be used by OSSE to determine the:

(1)

Number of children for whom pre-k is not available and whose parents would send them to pre-k but for the lack of availability;

(2)

Current capacity of all existing pre-k programs; and

(3)

Manner in which Head Start programs are incorporated in the early care and education delivery system.

July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-202, § 104, 55 DCR 6297